Florida, session 2026, HB945.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb945-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 945 2026
Section 1. Section 943.0316, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
943.0316 Statewide Counterintelligence and
Counterterrorism Unit.—
(1) It is the intent of the Legislature to establish a
dedicated counterintelligence and counterterrorism unit whose
primary goal is to conduct statewide counterintelligence and
counterterrorism activities to detect, identify, neutralize, and
exploit adversary intelligence entities, international and
domestic terrorists, insider threats, corporate threats, and
other foreign adversaries to protect this state and the United
States of America.
(2) As used in this section, the term "adversary
intelligence entity" includes, but is not limited to, any
national, foreign, multinational, friendly, competitor,
opponent, adversary, or recognized enemy government or
nongovernmental organization, company, business, corporation,
consortium, group, agency, cell, terrorist, insurgent, guerrilla
entity, or person whose demonstrated actions, views, or opinions
are a threat or are inimical to the interests of this state and
the United States of America.
(3) The Department of Law Enforcement shall establish and
administer a Statewide Counterintelligence and Counterterrorism
Unit housed at the department's regional operational center,
with a team from the unit assigned to and aligned with each
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb945-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 945 2026
regional domestic security task force established under s.
943.0312. The unit shall identify threats by analyzing patterns
of life, gathering actionable intelligence, and formulating
effective plans of action, and by executing arrests or by
revealing its intent to compel a response using all
counterintelligence and counterterrorism tradecraft necessary to
protect the state from adversary intelligence entities. The unit
may conduct direct action missions on its own against a threat
or may incorporate with or into other units to counteract and
stop identifiable threats.
(4) The department shall:
(a) Create a 10-person team by July 1, 2027, whose main
purpose is to serve as the initial leadership and organizational
core of the full unit;
(b) Establish a statewide unit, housed at the department's
regional operational center which must be composed of at least
seven teams, with a team being assigned to each regional
domestic security task force; and
(c) Each fiscal year, request the appropriate number of
positions and funding required for each position in order to be
fully staffed no later than December 30, 2033.
(5)(a) Each team shall perform tasks in support of the
state's domestic security mission, including, but not limited
to, providing technical operations to insider threat
investigations and assigning team officers to safeguard the
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb945-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 945 2026
state from adversary intelligence entities by using
counterintelligence to detect, identify, assess, and counteract
threats posed by such entities.
(b) Each team must, at a minimum, be composed of all of
the following:
1. A team leader who is an assistant special agent in
charge;
2. A facility security officer who is a special agent
supervisor with counterintelligence experience, to be assigned
four intelligence analysts; and
3. A deputy team leader who is a special agent supervisor,
to be assigned six counterintelligence agents, one of whom must
be a regional federal liaison officer, one of whom must be a
regional state liaison officer, and one of whom must be a local
liaison officer.
(c) Each team member must:
1. Have been a member of or have received formal training
in any United States government agency, have served as a United
States servicemember, or have experience with any law
enforcement agency as an officer, agent, analyst, or operative
serving in intelligence, counterintelligence, or
counterterrorism; or
2. Have at least 3 years of experience of actively working
in the fields of intelligence, counterintelligence, or
100 counterterrorism.
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb945-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 945 2026
101 Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 5 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb945-00